Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-852
Commercial feed; label requirements; customer-formula feed; requirements.

A commercial feed shall be labeled as follows:

(1) In the case of a commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, it shall be accompanied by a label bearing the following:

(a) The net weight;

(b) The product name and the brand name, if any, under which the commercial feed is distributed;

(c) The guaranteed analysis stated in such terms as the director, by regulation, determines is required to advise the user of the composition of the feed or to support claims made in the labeling. In all cases, the substances or elements guaranteed shall be determinable by laboratory methods such as the methods published by the AOAC International or other generally recognized methods;

(d) The common or usual name of each feed ingredient used in the manufacture of the commercial feed, except that the director, by regulation, may permit the use of a collective term of a group of feed ingredients which perform a similar function or he or she may exempt such commercial feeds, or any group thereof, from this requirement of a feed ingredient statement if he or she finds that such statement is not required in the interest of consumers;

(e) The name and principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible for distributing the commercial feed;

(f) Adequate directions for use for all commercial feeds containing drugs and for such other feeds as the director, by regulation, may deem necessary for their safe and effective use; and

(g) Such precautionary statements as the director, by regulation, determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the commercial feed; and

(2) In the case of a customer-formula feed, it shall be accompanied by a label, invoice, delivery slip, or other shipping document bearing the following information:

(a) Name and address of the manufacturer;

(b) Name and address of the purchaser;

(c) Date of manufacture;

(d) The product name and net weight of each commercial feed and each other feed ingredient used in the mixture;

(e) Adequate directions for use for all customer-formula feeds;

(f) The directions for use and precautionary statements as required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director; and

(g) If a drug-containing product is used:

(i) The purpose of the medication or a claim statement;

(ii) The established name and level of each active drug ingredient and the level of each drug used in the final mixture expressed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director; and

(iii) All appropriate precautions, warnings, and withdrawal statements as required by the director.

A duplicate copy of all the information required in subdivision (2) of this section shall be kept by the manufacturer for use by the department for sampling and inspection purposes.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 15.